Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB348.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Assisted reproductive technology" means all treatments or procedures
which include the handling of human oocytes or embryos, including in vitro
fertilization, gamete intrafallopian transfer, and zygote intrafallopian
transfer; and
(b) "Health care provider" means a health care facility or individual that is:
1. Engaged or seeks to engage in the delivery of assisted reproductive
technology, including through the provision of evidence-based
information, counseling, referrals, or items and services that relate to,
aid in, or provide fertility treatment; and
2. Licensed by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure under KRS
Chapter 311 or the Kentucky Board of Nursing under KRS Chapter
314.
(2) The Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions shall not prohibit,
unreasonably limit, or interfere with the right of:
(a) An individual to access assisted reproductive technology; or
(b) A health care provider to perform or assist with the performance of assisted
reproductive technology treatments or procedures.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the enforcement of health and
safety regulations related to the operation of health care facilities or providers.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A fertilized human egg or human embryo that exists in any form outside of the uterus
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/9/2025 1:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1049
of a human body shall not be considered an unborn child, a minor child, a natural
person, or any other term that connotes a human being for any purpose under state
law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/9/2025 1:43 PM Jacketed